Connecticut, session 2026, SB00401.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (Effective from passage) (a) As used in this section,
2 "vulnerable persons" means veterans, homeless persons or persons at
3 risk of homelessness, adults diagnosed with autism spectrum disorder,
4 young adults aging out of the foster care system and persons age fifty-
5 five to sixty-four who are at risk of losing benefits under the Medicaid
6 and supplemental nutrition assistance programs and permanent
7 supportive housing assistance due to changes in work requirements
8 pursuant to P.L. 119-21 and proposed changes to United States
9 Department of Housing and Urban Development regulations.
10 (b) Not later than October 1, 2026, the Commissioner of Social
11 Services, in collaboration with the Commissioners of Aging and
12 Disability Services, Children and Families, Housing and Mental Health
13 and Addiction Services and the Labor Commissioner, shall develop a
14 plan for a bridge program to provide state-funded medical assistance,
SB401 / File No. 660 1

SB401 File No. 660
15 nutrition assistance, supportive housing and employment assistance
16 programs to vulnerable persons. The program shall:
17 (1) Supplement (A) current job support programs administered by
18 the Bureau of Rehabilitation Services within the Department of Aging
19 and Disability Services, (B) the Jobs First Employment Services program
20 for recipients of temporary family assistance, and (C) other employment
21 services offered by the state Labor Department for veterans and other
22 vulnerable persons to help such persons meet federal work
23 requirements and transition from permanent supportive housing
24 programs;
25 (2) Provide transitional state-funded medical assistance, nutrition
26 assistance and housing assistance equivalent to such assistance
27 vulnerable persons would have received until changes in federal law
28 and proposed changes in federal regulations;
29 (3) Recommend long-term housing solutions for vulnerable persons,
30 including, but not limited to, an inventory of state-owned property that
31 may be suitable for renovation and repurposing to provide housing
32 assistance; and
33 (4) Require uniform documentation of employability of vulnerable
34 persons after they receive employment assistance for purposes of
35 submission to the federal government for potential federal waivers of
36 work requirements.
37 (c) Not later than January 1, 2027, the Commissioner of Social Services
38 shall submit the plan for the bridge program, together with a calculation
39 of the amount of state appropriations needed to implement the bridge
40 program and a timeline for implementation, to the joint standing
41 committees of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
42 relating to appropriations and the budgets of state agencies, human
43 services, housing and labor.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
SB401 / File No. 660 2

SB401 File No. 660
Section 1 from passage New section
APP Joint Favorable
SB401 / File No. 660 3

SB401 File No. 660
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill, which requires the Department of Social Services to
collaborate with various agencies to develop a plan for a bridge program
to provide state-funded medical, nutrition, and employment assistance
as well as supportive housing to vulnerable persons and report to
relevant committees by 1/1/27, has no fiscal impact as the agency has
the necessary expertise to do so.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
SB401 / File No. 660 4

SB401 File No. 660
OFA Bill Analysis
SB 401
AN ACT CONCERNING A BRIDGE PROGRAM TO ALLOW ACCESS
TO FOOD, HOUSING AND HEALTH CARE BENEFITS.
SUMMARY:
The bill requires the Commissioner of the Department of Social
Services (DSS), in collaboration with the Departments of Aging and
Disability Services, Children and Families, Housing, Mental Health and
Addiction Services and Labor, to develop a plan for a bridge program
to provide state-funded medical assistance, nutrition assistance,
supportive housing and employment assistance programs to vulnerable
persons. DSS must submit the plan, a calculation of state appropriations
necessary for implementation and the associated timeline for such, to
the Appropriations, Human Services, Housing and Labor committees
by January 1, 2027.
EFFECTIVE DATE: from passage
State-Funded Bridge Program
The bill requires that the bridge program serve vulnerable persons
and do the following:
1. Supplement job training and employment services offered by the
state to assist with meeting federal work requirements and
transitions from permanent supportive housing programs;
2. Provide transitional state-funded medical assistance, nutrition
assistance and housing assistance at the same level as prior to
changes in federal law and proposed changes in federal
regulations;
3. Recommend long-term housing solutions, including an inventory
SB401 / File No. 660 5

SB401 File No. 660
of state-owned property that may be suitable for renovation and
repurposing to provide housing assistance; and
4. Require uniform documentation of employability after receiving
employment assistance, for purposes of submission to the federal
government for potential federal waivers of work requirements.
Vulnerable Persons
Under the bill, “vulnerable persons” include veterans, homeless
persons or persons at risk of homelessness, adults diagnosed with
autism spectrum disorder, young adults aging out of the foster care
system and persons age fifty-five to sixty-four who are at risk of losing
benefits under the Medicaid and supplemental nutrition assistance
programs and permanent supportive housing assistance due to changes
in work requirements pursuant to P.L. 119-21 and proposed changes to
United States Department of Housing and Urban Development
regulations.
COMMITTEE ACTION
Appropriations Committee
Joint Favorable Report
Yea 43 Nay 8 (04/01/2026)
SB401 / File No. 660 6